Missouri, session 2026, HB3323.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 191.950, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 191.950, to read as follows:
191.950. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(2) "Economically challenged men", men who have a gross income up to one hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty level;
(3) "Program", the prostate cancer [pilot] program established in this section;
(4) "Rural area", a rural area which is in either any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than twenty thousand but fewer than
twenty thousand one hundred inhabitants, any county of the second classification with more
than nineteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand eight hundred
inhabitants, or any county of the third classification with a township form of government and
with more than thirty-three thousand one hundred but fewer than thirty-three thousand two
hundred inhabitants;
(5) "Uninsured men", men for whom services provided by the program are not
covered by private insurance, MO HealthNet or Medicare;
(6) "Urban area", an urban area which is located in a city not within a county.
2. Subject to securing a cooperative agreement with a nonprofit entity for funding of
the program, there is hereby established within the department of health and senior services
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3323 2
two "Prostate Cancer [Pilot] Programs" to fund prostate cancer screening and treatment
services and to provide education to men residing in this state. One prostate cancer [pilot]
program shall be located in an urban area and one prostate cancer [pilot] program shall be
located in a rural area. The department may directly contract with the Missouri Foundation
for Health, or a successor entity, in the delivery of the [pilot] program. For purposes of this
section, the contracting process of the department with these entities need not be governed by
the provisions of chapter 34.
3. The program shall be open to:
(1) Uninsured men or economically challenged men who are at least fifty years old;
and
(2) On the advice of a physician or at the request of the individual, uninsured men or
economically challenged men who are at least thirty-five years of age but less than fifty years
of age and who are at high risk for prostate cancer.
4. The program [shall] may provide:
(1) Prostate cancer screening and prostate-specific antigen testing;
(2) Referral services, including services necessary for diagnosis and referrals for
mental health assessments;
(3) Treatment services for individuals who are diagnosed with prostate cancer after
being screened; [and]
(4) Support group services through the establishment of support groups for men
suffering from prostate cancer; and
(5) Outreach and education activities to ensure awareness and utilization of program
services by uninsured men and economically challenged men.
5. Upon appropriation, the department shall distribute grants to administer the
program to:
(1) Local health departments; and
(2) Federally qualified health centers.
6. Three years from the date on which the grants were first administered under this
section, the department shall report to the governor and general assembly:
(1) The number of individuals screened and treated under the program, including
racial and ethnic data on the individuals who were screened and treated; and
(2) To the extent possible, any cost savings achieved by the program as a result of
early detection of prostate cancer.
7. The department shall promulgate rules to establish guidelines regarding eligibility
for the program and to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of

HB 3323 3
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2011, shall be invalid and void.
8. [Under and pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset six years after August 28, 2011, unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset six years after the effective date of the reauthorization of this section;
and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is sunset] This
section shall not be subject to the provisions of the Missouri sunset act under sections
23.250 to 23.298.
✔